North Carolina, session 2025, SB994.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 163-166.35 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(d1) For early voting occurring at fire stations, county boards of elections shall do each of
the following:
(1) Provide traffic control measures.
(2) Provide security as a physical safeguard for county board staff and officials,
voters, and fire station staff at the voting place.
(3) Provide phone support for voters needing assistance with matters pertaining
to the elections process.
(4) Provide sufficient signage on election day to voters if the same fire station will
not be a voting place on election day.
(5) Agree to indemnify and hold harmless a fire station for any claims for
damages to voters or property arising from use of the fire station as a voting
place while engaged in the voting process.
(6) Ensure service levels for those fire stations are not affected, including entrance
and exit accessibility."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections
occurring on or after that date.
*S994-v-1*